Hawaii statutes.
[§420D‑8] Standard of conduct for
officers. (a) Each officer of a sustainable business corporation shall
consider the interests and factors described in section 420D-6(a) in the manner
provided in that section when:

(1) The officer has discretion to act with respect to
a matter; and

(2) It reasonably appears to the officer that the
matter may have a material effect on:

(A) The creation of a general or specific
public benefit by the sustainable business corporation; or

(B) Any of the interests or factors referred
to in section 420D-6(a).

(b) An officer shall not be personally liable
for monetary damages for any action taken as an officer if the officer
performed the duties of the position in compliance with the general standards
of conduct pursuant to section 414-233. [L 2011, c 209, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next